Utah statutes.
61-2-24.   Mishandling of trust funds.
(1)  The division may audit principal brokers' trust accounts or other
accounts in which a licensee maintains trust funds under this chapter.  If the
division's audit shows, in the opinion of the division, gross mismanagement,
commingling, or misuse of funds, the division, with the concurrence of the
commission, may order a complete audit of the account by a certified public
accountant at the licensee's expense, or take other action in accordance with
Section 61-2-12.
(2)  The licensee may obtain agency review by the executive director or
judicial review of any division order.
(3)  If it appears that a person has grossly mismanaged, commingled, or
otherwise misused trust funds, the division, with or without prior
administrative proceedings, may bring an action in the district court of the
district where the person resides or maintains a place of business, or where
the act or practice occurred or is about to occur, to enjoin the acts or
practices and to enforce compliance with this chapter or any rule or order
under this chapter.  Upon a proper showing, the court shall grant injunctive
relief or a temporary restraining order, and may appoint a receiver or
conservator.  The division is not required to post a bond in any court
proceeding.
